Wisconsin, session 2025, AB423.
do enact as follows:AB423,11Section 1. 20.835 (4) (a) of the statutes is created to read:AB423,2,3220.835 (4) (a) Back-to-school sales tax holiday reimbursement. A sum 3sufficient to make payments to counties and municipalities under s. 77.76 (3w).AB423,24Section 2. 77.52 (13) of the statutes is amended to read:AB423,2,16577.52 (13) For the purpose of the proper administration of this section and to 6prevent evasion of the sales tax it shall be presumed that all receipts are subject to 7the tax until the contrary is established. The burden of proving that a sale of 8tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods under sub. (1) (b), (c), or (d), 9or services is not a taxable sale at retail is upon the person who makes the sale 10unless that person takes from the purchaser an electronic or a paper certificate, in 11a manner prescribed by the department, to the effect that the property, item, good, 12or service is purchased for resale or is otherwise exempt, except that no certificate is 13required for the sale of tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods 14under sub. (1) (b), (c), or (d), or services that are exempt under s. 77.54 (5) (a) 3., (7), 15(7m), (8), (10), (11), (14), (15), (17), (20n), (21), (22b), (31), (32), (35), (36), (37), (42), 16(44), (45), (46), (51), (52), (64), (66), (67), (71), and (72), and (76).AB423,317Section 3. 77.53 (10) of the statutes is amended to read:AB423,3,71877.53 (10) For the purpose of the proper administration of this section and to 19prevent evasion of the use tax and the duty to collect the use tax, it is presumed 20that tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), 21(c), or (d), or taxable services sold by any person for delivery in this state is sold for 22storage, use, or other consumption in this state until the contrary is established. 23The burden of proving the contrary is upon the person who makes the sale unless 24that person takes from the purchaser an electronic or paper certificate, in a manner 1prescribed by the department, to the effect that the property, or items, property, or 2goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), (c), or (d), or taxable service is purchased for resale, or 3otherwise exempt from the tax, except that no certificate is required for the sale of 4tangible personal property, or items, property, or goods under s. 77.52 (1) (b), (c), or 5(d), or services that are exempt under s. 77.54 (7), (7m), (8), (10), (11), (14), (15), (17), 6(20n), (21), (22b), (31), (32), (35), (36), (37), (42), (44), (45), (46), (51), (52), (64), (66), 7(67), (71), and (72), and (76).AB423,48Section 4. 77.54 (76) of the statutes is created to read:AB423,3,9977.54 (76) (a) In this subsection:AB423,3,11101. “Clothing” means any wearing apparel for humans that is suitable for 11general use and does not include any of the following:AB423,3,1212a. Belt buckles sold separately.AB423,3,1313b. Costume masks sold separately.AB423,3,1414c. Patches and emblems sold separately.AB423,3,1615d. Sewing equipment and supplies, including knitting needles, patterns, pins, 16scissors, sewing machines, sewing needles, tape measures, and thimbles.AB423,3,1817e. Sewing materials that become part of clothing, including buttons, fabric, 18lace, thread, yarn, and zippers.AB423,3,1919f. Clothing accessories or equipment.AB423,3,2020g. Protective equipment.AB423,3,2121h. Sport or recreational equipment.AB423,3,24222. “Clothing accessories or equipment” means incidental items worn on the 23person or in conjunction with clothing, not including clothing, protective equipment 24or sport or recreational equipment, but including all of the following:AB423,4,11a. Briefcases.AB423,4,22b. Cosmetics.AB423,4,33c. Hair notions, including barrettes, hair bows, and hair nets.AB423,4,44d. Handbags.AB423,4,55e. Handkerchiefs.AB423,4,66f. Jewelry.AB423,4,77g. Nonprescription sunglasses.AB423,4,88h. Umbrellas.AB423,4,99i. Wallets.AB423,4,1010j. Watches.AB423,4,1111k. Wigs.AB423,4,1212L. Hairpieces.AB423,4,14133. “Eligible property” means an item that qualifies for exemption under par. 14(b).AB423,4,20154. “Layaway sale” means a transaction in which property is set aside for 16future delivery to a customer who makes a deposit, agrees to pay the balance of the 17sales price of the property over time, and, at the end of the payment period, receives 18the property. An order is accepted for layaway sale by a seller when the seller 19removes the property from inventory or clearly identifies the property as sold to the 20purchaser.AB423,5,2215. “Protective equipment” means items for human wear that are designed to 22protect the wearer against injury or disease or to protect property or other persons 23from damage or injury. “Protective equipment” does not include items suitable for 1general use, clothing, clothing accessories or equipment, or sport or recreational 2equipment. “Protective equipment” includes all of the following:AB423,5,33a. Breathing masks.AB423,5,44b. Clean room apparel and equipment.AB423,5,55c. Ear and hearing protectors.AB423,5,66d. Face shields.AB423,5,77e. Hard hats.AB423,5,88f. Helmets.AB423,5,99g. Paint or dust respirators.AB423,5,1010h. Protective gloves.AB423,5,1111i. Safety glasses and goggles.AB423,5,1212j. Safety belts.AB423,5,1313k. Tool belts. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab423 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab423 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB423 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB423 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB423: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting